New York, session 2025-2026, A3111.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 117 of the highway law, as amended by chapter 542 2 of the laws of 1981, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 117. Construction and reconstruction of county roads. Construction 4 or reconstruction of such roads, including necessary grade and culvert 5 work, and any plans and specifications therefor, shall conform to an 6 outline or general plan of the work, and such construction or recon- 7 struction must be done under the immediate direct supervision of the 8 county superintendent or a competent [foreman] foreperson designated by 9 [him] such county superintendent. All or any part of such construction 10 or reconstruction may be done by contract or by direct employment of 11 labor and purchase of material, or both. The machinery needed for work 12 done under this article, unless furnished by the contractor, shall be 13 provided as follows: 14 The county superintendent may rent road machinery from any person, 15 company, corporation, or from any city, town or towns [in the county], 16 village, or from any other county, and such rental shall be payable from 17 the county road fund; or [he] they may use road building machinery, 18 equipment, tools and implements purchased with county moneys, and when- 19 ever used for the purpose of this article, a charge therefor, in the 20 nature of rental, shall be payable from the county road fund on itemized EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06265-01-5 A. 3111 2 1 vouchers certified by the county superintendent showing where the 2 machinery was used, together with the amount chargeable to each appro- 3 priation or construction project. The provisions of subdivision three of 4 section one hundred ninety-five, and of subdivisions four, five and six 5 of section one hundred ninety-four of this chapter shall apply to work 6 carried on pursuant to the provisions of this article. 7 § 2. Section 142-d of the highway law, as amended by chapter 347 of 8 the laws of 1997, is amended to read as follows: 9 § 142-d. Rental or hiring of town highway machinery, tools or equip- 10 ment. [Except as otherwise provided in section one hundred forty-two-c 11 of this chapter with respect to the use of town highway machinery, snow 12 and ice removal equipment, tools and equipment by a village located 13 wholly or partly within the town, the] The town superintendent of high- 14 ways, with the approval of the town board, may permit the use of any 15 town-owned highway machinery, tools or equipment by a county or any 16 municipality, district, district corporation, school district, community 17 college, and any unit of the state university of New York, upon such 18 terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties involved. 19 Moneys received by a town pursuant to the provisions of this section 20 shall be applicable for the purposes for which amounts may be raised as 21 provided in subdivision three of section two hundred seventy-one of this 22 chapter. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.